Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202583-1,125
Warrant or detainer; director; board; duties.

(1) If a warrant or detainer is placed against a committed offender by a court, parole agency, or other authority of this or any other jurisdiction, the director shall inquire before such offender becomes eligible for parole whether the authority concerned intends to execute or withdraw the warrant or detainer when the offender is released.

(2) If the authority notifies the director that it intends to execute the warrant or detainer when the offender is released, the director shall advise the authority concerned of the sentence under which the offender is held, the time of parole eligibility, any decision of the board relating to the offender, and the nature of the offender's adjustment during imprisonment and shall give reasonable notice to such authority of the offender's release date.

(3) The board may parole an offender who is eligible for release to a warrant or detainer. If an offender is paroled to such a warrant or detainer, the board may provide, as a condition of release, that if the charge or charges on which the warrant or detainer is based are dismissed, or are satisfied after conviction and sentence, prior to the expiration of the offender's parole term, the authority to whose warrant or detainer the offender is released shall return the offender to serve the remainder of the parole term or such part as the board may determine.

(4) If a person paroled to a warrant or detainer is thereafter sentenced and placed on probation, or released on parole in another jurisdiction, prior to the expiration of the parole term less good time in this state, the board may permit the person to serve the remainder of the parole term or such part as the board may determine concurrently with the person's new probation or parole term. Such concurrent terms may be served in either of the two jurisdictions, and supervision shall be administered in accordance with the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 56, p. 3101;

Laws 1992, LB 816, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 27;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 49;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 155.

Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, see section 29-2639.